District of Columbia statutes.
47-2607

Revocation of license for failure to file statement.

If any such company shall fail to file the annual statement herein required, the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] may thereupon revoke its license or certificate of authority to transact business in the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 676, ch. 690, title II, § 5
renumbered as § 7, Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(jj), 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2607.
1973 Ed., § 47-1805.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2603.